California statutes. Civil Code
======================================================================
  Civil Code
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Last Updated by State of California: October 02, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

TITLE OF THE ACT

1.

This Act shall be known as The Civil Code of the State of California, and is in Four Divisions, as follows: 

 I.—THE FIRST RELATING TO PERSONS.

 II.—THE SECOND TO PROPERTY.

III.—THE THIRD TO OBLIGATIONS.

IV.—THE FOURTH CONTAINS GENERAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO THE THREE PRECEDING DIVISIONS.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS

2.

This Code takes effect at twelve o'clock noon, on the first day of January, eighteen hundred and seventy-three.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3.

No part of it is retroactive, unless expressly so declared.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

The rule of the common law, that statutes in derogation thereof are to be strictly construed, has no application to this Code. The Code establishes the law of this State respecting the subjects to which it relates, and its provisions are to be liberally construed with a view to effect its objects and to promote justice.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

The provisions of this Code, so far as they are substantially the same as existing statutes or the common law, must be construed as continuations thereof, and not as new enactments.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

No action or proceeding commenced before this Code takes effect, and no right accrued, is affected by its provisions.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

Holidays within the meaning of this code are every Sunday and such other days as are specified or provided for as holidays in the Government Code of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

7.1.

Optional bank holidays within the meaning of Section 9 are:

(a) Any closing of a bank because of an extraordinary situation, as that term is defined in the Bank Extraordinary Situation Closing Act (Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 3600) of Division 1 of the Financial Code).

(b) Every Saturday.

(c) Every Sunday.

(d) January 1st.

(e) The third Monday in January, known as “Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. Day.”

(f) February 12, known as “Lincoln Day.”

(g) The third Monday in February.

(h) The last Monday in May.

(i) July 4th.

(j) The first Monday in September.

(k) September 9th, known as “Admission Day.”

(l) The second Monday in October, known as “Columbus Day.”

(m) November 11th, known as “Veteran’s Day.”

(n) December 25th.

(o) Good Friday from 12 noon until closing.

(p) The Thursday in November appointed as “Thanksgiving Day.”

(q) Any Monday following any Sunday on which January 1st, February 12th, July 4th, September 9th, November 11th, or December 25th falls.

(r) Any Friday preceding any Saturday on which July 4th, September 9th, or December 25th falls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 668, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

All other days than those mentioned in Section 7 are business days for all purposes; provided, that as to any act appointed by law or contract, or in any other way, to be performed by, at, or through any bank organized under the laws of or doing business in this state, any optional bank holiday as defined in Section 7.1 is not a business day; and provided, that any act appointed by law or contract, or in any other way, to be performed on any day which is an optional bank holiday as defined in Section 7.1, by, at, or through any bank or branch or office thereof, whether
acting in its own behalf or in any other capacity whatsoever, may be performed on that optional bank holiday if the bank or branch or office by, at, or through which the act is to be performed is open for the transaction of business on that optional bank holiday, or, at the option of the person obligated to perform the act, it may be performed on the next succeeding business day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 668, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

The time in which any act provided by law is to be done is computed by excluding the first day and including the last, unless the last day is a holiday, and then it is also excluded.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

Whenever any act of a secular nature, other than a work of necessity or mercy, is appointed by law or contract to be performed upon a particular day, which day falls upon a holiday, it may be performed upon the next business day, with the same effect as if it had been performed upon the day appointed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

Words giving a joint authority to three or more public officers or other persons are construed as giving such authority to a majority of them, unless it is otherwise expressed in the Act giving the authority.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

13.

Words and phrases are construed according to the context and the approved usage of the language; but technical words and phrases, and such others as may have acquired a peculiar and appropriate meaning in law, or are defined in the succeeding section, are to be construed according to such peculiar and appropriate meaning or definition.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

14.

(a) Words used in this code in the present tense include the future as well as the present; words used in the masculine gender include the feminine and neuter; the singular number includes the plural, and the plural the singular; the word person includes a corporation as well as a natural person; county includes city and county; writing includes printing and typewriting; oath includes affirmation or
declaration; and every mode of oral statement, under oath or affirmation, is embraced by the term “testify,” and every written one in the term “depose”; signature or subscription includes mark, when the person cannot write, his name being written near it, by a person who writes his own name as a witness; provided, that when a signature is by mark it must in order that the same may be acknowledged or may serve as the signature to any sworn statement be witnessed by two persons who must subscribe their own names as witnesses thereto.

(b) The following words have in this code the signification attached to them in this section, unless otherwise apparent from the context:

(1) The word “property” includes property real and personal.

(2) The words “real property” are coextensive with lands, tenements, and
hereditaments.

(3) The words “personal property” include money, goods, chattels, things in action, and evidences of debt.

(4) The word “month” means a calendar month, unless otherwise expressed.

(5) The word “will” includes codicil.

(6) The word “section” whenever hereinafter employed refers to a section of this code, unless some other code or statute is expressly mentioned.

(7) The word “spouse” includes a registered domestic partner, as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 3.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17.

Wherever any notice or other communication is required by this code to be mailed by registered mail, the mailing of such notice or other communication by certified mail shall be deemed to be a sufficient compliance with the requirements of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

18.

Notice is:

1. Actual—which consists in express information of a fact; or,

2. Constructive—which is imputed by law.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

19.

Every person who has actual notice of circumstances sufficient to put a prudent person upon inquiry as to a particular fact has constructive notice of the fact itself in all cases in which, by prosecuting such inquiry, he or she might have learned that fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 15.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

20.

No statute, law, or rule is continued in force because it is consistent with the provisions of this Code on the same subject; but in all cases provided for by this Code, all statutes, laws, and rules heretofore in force in this State, whether consistent or not with the provisions of this Code, unless expressly continued in force by it, are repealed or abrogated.

This repeal or abrogation does not revive any former law heretofore repealed, nor does it affect any right already existing or accrued, or any action or proceeding already taken, except as in this Code provided.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

21.

This Act, whenever cited, enumerated, referred to, or amended, may be designated simply as “The Civil Code,” adding, when necessary, the number of the section.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DEFINITIONS AND SOURCES OF LAW

22.

Law is a solemn expression of the will of the supreme power of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

22.1.

The will of the supreme power is expressed:

(a) By the Constitution.

(b) By statutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

22.2.

The common law of England, so far as it is not repugnant to or inconsistent with the Constitution of the United States, or the Constitution or laws of this State, is the rule of decision in all the courts of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

EFFECT OF THE 1872 CODES

23.

With relation to the laws passed at the 1872 Session of the Legislature, the Political Code, Civil Code, Code of Civil Procedure, and Penal Code, shall be construed as though each had been passed on the first day of the session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

23.1.

The provisions of any law passed at the 1872 Session of the Legislature which contravene or are inconsistent with the provisions of any of the four codes passed at the 1872 Session prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

23.2.

With relation to each other, the provisions of the four codes shall be construed as though all such codes had been passed at the same moment of time and were parts of the same statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

23.3.

If the provisions of any title conflict with or contravene the provisions of another title, the provisions of each title shall prevail as to all matters and questions arising out of the subject matter of the title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

23.4.

If the provisions of any chapter conflict with or contravene the provisions of another chapter of the same title, the provisions of each chapter shall prevail as to all matters and questions arising out of the subject matter of the chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

23.5.

If the provisions of any article conflict with or contravene the provisions of another article of the same chapter, the provisions of each article shall prevail as to all matters and questions arising out of the subject matter of the article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

23.6.

If conflicting provisions are found in different sections of the same chapter or article, the provisions of the sections last in numerical order shall prevail, unless such construction is inconsistent with the meaning of the chapter or article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. PERSONS [38. - 86.]



PART 1. PERSONS WITH UNSOUND MIND [38. - 41.]

38.

A person entirely without understanding has no power to make a contract of any kind, but the person is liable for the reasonable value of things furnished to the person necessary for the support of the person or the person’s family.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

39.

(a) A conveyance or other contract of a person of unsound mind, but not entirely without understanding, made before the incapacity of the person has been judicially determined, is subject to rescission, as provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1688) of Title 5 of Part 2 of Division 3.

(b) A rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof that a person is of unsound mind shall exist for purposes of this section if the person is substantially unable to manage his or
 her own financial resources or resist fraud or undue influence. Substantial inability may not be proved solely by isolated incidents of negligence or improvidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40.

(a) Subject to Section 1871 of the Probate Code, and subject to Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, after his or her incapacity has been judicially determined a person of unsound mind can make no conveyance or other contract, nor delegate any power or waive any right, until his or her restoration to capacity.

(b) Subject to Sections 1873 to 1876, inclusive, of the Probate Code, the establishment of a conservatorship under
 Division 4 (commencing with Section 1400) of the Probate Code is a judicial determination of the incapacity of the conservatee for the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

41.

A person of unsound mind, of whatever degree, is civilly liable for a wrong done by the person, but is not liable in exemplary damages unless at the time of the act the person was capable of knowing that the act was wrongful.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. PERSONAL RIGHTS [43. - 53.9.]

43.

Besides the personal rights mentioned or recognized in the Government Code, every person has, subject to the qualifications and restrictions provided by law, the right of protection from bodily restraint or harm, from personal insult, from defamation, and from injury to his personal relations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 604.)
-------------------------------------------

43.1.

A child conceived, but not yet born, is deemed an existing person, so far as necessary for the child’s interests in the event of the child’s subsequent birth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

43.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a mother may breastfeed her child in any location, public or private, except the private home or residence of another, where the mother and the child are otherwise authorized to be present.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

43.4.

A fraudulent promise to marry or to cohabit after marriage does not give rise to a cause of action for damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 381.)
-------------------------------------------

43.5.

No cause of action arises for:

(a) Alienation of affection.

(b) Criminal conversation.

(c) Seduction of a person over the age of legal consent.

(d) Breach of promise of marriage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

43.54.

(a) A person shall not be subject to civil arrest in a courthouse while attending a court proceeding or having legal business in the courthouse.

(b) This section does not narrow, or in any way lessen, any existing common law privilege.

(c) This section does not apply to arrests made pursuant to a valid judicial warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 787, Sec. 2.   (AB 668)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

43.55.

(a) There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, any peace officer who makes an arrest pursuant to a warrant of arrest regular upon its face if the peace officer in making the arrest acts without malice and in the reasonable belief that the person arrested is the one referred to in the warrant.

(b) As used in this section, a “warrant of arrest regular upon its face” includes both of the following:

(1) A paper
 arrest warrant that has been issued pursuant to a judicial order.

(2) A judicial order that is entered into an automated warrant system by law enforcement or court personnel authorized to make those entries at or near the time the judicial order is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 706, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

43.56.

No cause of action arises against a foster parent for alienation of affection of a foster child.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 43.55 (as amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 195) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 216, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

43.6.

(a) No cause of action arises against a parent of a child based upon the claim that the child should not have been conceived or, if conceived, should not have been allowed to have been born alive.

(b) The failure or refusal of a parent to prevent the live birth of his or her child shall not be a defense in any action against a third party, nor shall the failure or refusal be considered in awarding damages in any such action.

(c) As used in this section “conceived” means the fertilization of a human ovum by a
 human sperm.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 331, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

43.7.

(a) There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action for damages shall arise against, any member of a duly appointed mental health professional quality assurance committee that is established in compliance with Section 14725 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for any act or proceeding undertaken or performed within the scope of the functions of the committee which is formed to review and
 evaluate the adequacy, appropriateness, or effectiveness of the care and treatment planned for, or provided to, mental health patients in order to improve quality of care by mental health professionals if the committee member acts without malice, has made a reasonable effort to obtain the facts of the matter as to which he or she acts, and acts in reasonable belief that the action taken by him or her is warranted by the facts known to him or her after the reasonable effort to obtain facts.

(b) There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action for damages shall arise against, any professional society, any member of a duly appointed committee of a medical specialty society, or any member of a duly appointed committee of a state or local professional society, or duly appointed member of a committee of a professional staff of a licensed hospital (provided the professional staff operates pursuant to written bylaws that have
 been approved by the governing board of the hospital), for any act or proceeding undertaken or performed within the scope of the functions of the committee which is formed to maintain the professional standards of the society established by its bylaws, or any member of any peer review committee whose purpose is to review the quality of medical, dental, dietetic, chiropractic, optometric, acupuncture, psychotherapy, midwifery, or veterinary services rendered by physicians and surgeons, dentists, dental hygienists, podiatrists, registered dietitians, chiropractors, optometrists, acupuncturists, veterinarians, marriage and family therapists, professional clinical counselors, licensed midwives, or psychologists, which committee is composed chiefly of physicians and surgeons, dentists, dental hygienists, podiatrists, registered dietitians, chiropractors, optometrists, acupuncturists, veterinarians, marriage and family therapists, professional clinical counselors, licensed midwives or psychologists for any act or
 proceeding undertaken or performed in reviewing the quality of medical, dental, dietetic, chiropractic, optometric, acupuncture, psychotherapy, midwifery, or veterinary services rendered by physicians and surgeons, dentists, dental hygienists, podiatrists, registered dietitians, chiropractors, optometrists, acupuncturists, veterinarians, marriage and family therapists, professional clinical counselors, midwifery, or psychologists or any member of the governing board of a hospital in reviewing the quality of medical services rendered by members of the staff if the professional society, committee, or board member acts without malice, has made a reasonable effort to obtain the facts of the matter as to which he, she, or it acts, and acts in reasonable belief that the action taken by him, her, or it is warranted by the facts known to him, her, or it after the reasonable effort to obtain facts. “Professional society” includes legal, medical, psychological, dental, dental hygiene, dietetic, accounting, optometric,
 acupuncture, podiatric, pharmaceutic, chiropractic, physical therapist, veterinary, licensed marriage and family therapy, licensed clinical social work, licensed professional clinical counselor, and engineering organizations having as members at least 25 percent of the eligible persons or licentiates in the geographic area served by the particular society. However, if the society has fewer than 100 members, it shall have as members at least a majority of the eligible persons or licentiates in the geographic area served by the particular society.

“Medical specialty society” means an organization having as members at least 25 percent of the eligible physicians and surgeons within a given professionally recognized medical specialty in the geographic area served by the particular society.

(c) This section does not affect the official immunity of an officer or employee of a public corporation.

(d) There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action for damages shall arise against, any physician and surgeon, podiatrist, or chiropractor who is a member of an underwriting committee of an interindemnity or reciprocal or interinsurance exchange or mutual company for any act or proceeding undertaken or performed in evaluating physicians and surgeons, podiatrists, or chiropractors for the writing of professional liability insurance, or any act or proceeding undertaken or performed in evaluating physicians and surgeons for the writing of an interindemnity, reciprocal, or interinsurance contract as specified in Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code, if the evaluating physician and surgeon, podiatrist, or chiropractor acts without malice, has made a reasonable effort to obtain the facts of the matter as to which he or she acts, and acts in reasonable belief that the action taken by him or her is warranted by the facts known
 to him or her after the reasonable effort to obtain the facts.

(e) This section shall not be construed to confer immunity from liability on any quality assurance committee established in compliance with Section 14725 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or hospital. In any case in which, but for the enactment of the preceding provisions of this section, a cause of action would arise against a quality assurance committee established in compliance with Section 14725 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or hospital, the cause of action shall exist as if the preceding provisions of this section had not been enacted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 105.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

43.8.

(a) In addition to the privilege afforded by Section 47, there shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action for damages shall arise against, any person on account of the communication of information in the possession of that person to any hospital, hospital medical staff, veterinary hospital staff, professional society, medical, dental, podiatric, psychology, marriage and family therapy,
 professional clinical counselor, midwifery, or veterinary school, professional licensing board or division, committee or panel of a licensing board, the Senior Assistant Attorney General of the Health Quality Enforcement Section appointed under Section 12529 of the Government Code, peer review committee, quality assurance committees established in compliance with Sections 4070 and 5624 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or underwriting committee described in Section 43.7 when the communication is intended to aid in the evaluation of the qualifications, fitness, character, or insurability of a practitioner of the healing or veterinary arts.

(b) The immunities afforded by this section and by Section 43.7 shall not affect the availability of any absolute privilege that may be afforded by Section 47.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended in any way to affect the California
 Supreme Court’s decision in Hassan v. Mercy American River Hospital (2003) 31 Cal.4th 709, holding that subdivision (a) provides a qualified privilege.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 106.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

43.9.

(a) There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall accrue against, any health care provider for professional negligence on account of the receipt by such provider of an unsolicited referral, arising from a test performed by a multiphasic screening unit, for any act or omission, including the failure to examine, treat, or refer for examination or treatment any person concerning whom an unsolicited referral has been received. The immunity from liability granted by this subdivision shall only apply where a health provider meets the obligations established in subdivision (c).

(b) Every multiphasic screening unit shall notify each person it tests that the person should contact the health provider to whom the test results are sent within 10 days and that the health provider may not be obligated to interpret the results or provide further care. The multiphasic screening unit shall include the words “PATIENT TEST RESULTS” on the envelope of any test results sent to a health care provider, and shall include the address of the person tested in the test result material sent to the health care provider.

Nothing contained in this section shall relieve any health care provider from liability, if any, when at the time of receipt of the unsolicited referral there exists a provider-patient relationship, or a contract for health care services, or following receipt of such unsolicited referral there is established or reestablished a provider-patient relationship.

(c)A health care provider who receives unsolicited test results from a multiphasic screening unit shall receive immunity from liability pursuant to subdivision (a) only if the provider who receives such test results and does not wish to evaluate them, or evaluates them and takes no further action, either notifies the multiphasic screening unit of that fact or returns the test results within 21 days. If the health care provider reviews the test results and determines that they indicate a substantial risk of serious illness or death the provider shall make a reasonable effort to notify the person tested of the presumptive finding within 14 days after the provider has received the test results.

(d) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Health care provider” means any person licensed or certified pursuant to Division 2
 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, or licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and any clinic, health dispensary, or health facility licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code. “Health care provider” also includes the legal representatives of a health care provider.

(2) “Professional negligence” means an action for personal injury or wrongful death proximately caused by a health care provider’s negligent act or omission to act in the rendering of professional services, provided that such services are within the scope of services for which the health care provider is licensed and are not within any restriction imposed by the licensing agency or any licensed hospital.

(3) “Unsolicited referral” means any written report regarding the health, physical or mental condition of any person which was forwarded or delivered to a health care provider without prior request by such provider.

(4) A “multiphasic screening unit” means a facility which does not prescribe or treat patients but performs diagnostic testing only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

43.91.

(a) There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, any member of a duly appointed committee of a professional society which comprises a substantial percentage of the persons licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code and situated in the geographic area served by the particular society, for any act or proceeding undertaken or performed within the scope of the functions of any such committee which is formed to maintain the professional standards of the society established by its bylaws, if such member acts without
 malice, has made a reasonable effort to obtain the facts of the matter as to which he acts, and acts in reasonable belief that the action taken by him is warranted by the facts known to him after such reasonable effort to obtain facts.

(b) There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action for damages shall arise against, any person on account of the communication of information in the possession of such person to any committee specified in subdivision (a) when such communication is intended to aid in the evaluation of the qualifications, fitness or character of a member or applicant for membership in any such professional society, and does not represent as true any matter not reasonably believed to be true.

(c) The immunities afforded by this section shall not affect the availability of any absolute privilege which may be afforded by Section 47.

(d) This section shall not be construed to confer immunity from liability on any professional society. In any case in which, but for the enactment of this section, a cause of action would arise against a professional society, such cause of action shall exist as if this section had not been enacted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 492, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

43.92.

(a) There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, any person who is a psychotherapist as defined in Section 1010 of the Evidence Code in failing to protect from a patient’s threatened violent behavior or failing to predict and protect from a patient’s violent behavior except if the patient has communicated to the psychotherapist a serious threat of physical violence against a reasonably identifiable victim or
 victims.

(b) There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, a psychotherapist who, under the limited circumstances specified in subdivision (a), discharges his or her duty to protect by making reasonable efforts to communicate the threat to the victim or victims and to a law enforcement agency.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amendments made by the act adding this subdivision only change the name of the duty referenced in this section from a duty to warn and protect to a duty to protect. Nothing in this section shall be construed to be a substantive change, and any duty of a psychotherapist shall not be modified as a result of changing the wording in this section.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that a court interpret this section, as amended
 by the act adding this subdivision, in a manner consistent with the interpretation of this section as it read prior to January 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   (SB 1134)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

43.93.

(a) For the purposes of this section the following definitions are applicable:

(1) “Psychotherapy” means the professional treatment, assessment, or counseling of a mental or emotional illness, symptom, or condition.

(2) “Psychotherapist” means a physician and surgeon specializing in the practice of psychiatry, a psychologist, a
 psychological assistant, a marriage and family therapist, a registered marriage and family therapist intern or trainee, an educational psychologist, an associate clinical social worker, a licensed clinical social worker, a professional clinical counselor, or a registered clinical counselor intern or trainee.

(3) “Sexual contact” means the touching of an intimate part of another person. “Intimate part” and “touching” have the same meanings as defined in subdivisions (f) and (d), respectively, of Section 243.4 of the Penal Code. For the purposes of this section, sexual contact includes sexual intercourse, sodomy, and oral copulation.

(4) “Therapeutic relationship” exists during the time the patient or client is rendered professional service by the psychotherapist.

(5) “Therapeutic deception” means a representation by a
 psychotherapist that sexual contact with the psychotherapist is consistent with or part of the patient’s or former patient’s treatment.

(b) A cause of action against a psychotherapist for sexual contact exists for a patient or former patient for injury caused by sexual contact with the psychotherapist, if the sexual contact occurred under any of the following conditions:

(1) During the period the patient was receiving psychotherapy from the psychotherapist.

(2) Within two years following termination of therapy.

(3) By means of therapeutic deception.

(c) The patient or former patient may recover damages from a psychotherapist who is found liable for sexual contact. It is not a defense to
 the action that sexual contact with a patient occurred outside a therapy or treatment session or that it occurred off the premises regularly used by the psychotherapist for therapy or treatment sessions. No cause of action shall exist between spouses within a marriage.

(d) In an action for sexual contact, evidence of the plaintiff’s sexual history is not subject to discovery and is not admissible as evidence except in either of the following situations:

(1) The plaintiff claims damage to sexual functioning.

(2) The defendant requests a hearing prior to conducting discovery and makes an offer of proof of the relevancy of the history, and the court finds that the history is relevant and the probative value of the history outweighs its prejudicial effect.

The court shall allow
 the discovery or introduction as evidence only of specific information or examples of the plaintiff’s conduct that are determined by the court to be relevant. The court’s order shall detail the information or conduct that is subject to discovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 16.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

43.95.

(a) There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action for damages shall arise against, any professional society or any nonprofit corporation authorized by a professional society to operate a referral service, or their agents, employees, or members, for referring any member of the public to any professional member of the society or service, or for acts of negligence or conduct constituting unprofessional conduct committed by a professional
 to whom a member of the public was referred, so long as any of the foregoing persons or entities has acted without malice, and the referral was made at no cost added to the initial referral fee as part of a public service referral system organized under the auspices of the professional society. Further, there shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action for damages shall arise against, any professional society for providing a telephone information library available for use by the general public without charge, nor against any nonprofit corporation authorized by a professional society for providing a telephone information library available for use by the general public without charge. “Professional society” includes legal, psychological, architectural, medical, dental, dietetic, accounting, optometric, podiatric, pharmaceutic, chiropractic, veterinary, licensed marriage and family therapy, licensed clinical social work, professional clinical counselor, and engineering organizations
 having as members at least 25 percent of the eligible persons or licentiates in the geographic area served by the particular society. However, if the society has less than 100 members, it shall have as members at least a majority of the eligible persons or licentiates in the geographic area served by the particular society. “Professional society” also includes organizations with referral services that have been authorized by the State Bar of California and operated in accordance with its Minimum Standards for a Lawyer Referral Service in California, and organizations that have been established to provide free assistance or representation to needy patients or clients.

(b) This section shall not apply whenever the professional society, while making a referral to a professional member of the society, fails to disclose the nature of any disciplinary action of which it has actual knowledge taken by a state licensing agency against that professional
 member. However, there shall be no duty to disclose a disciplinary action in either of the following cases:

(1) Where a disciplinary proceeding results in no disciplinary action being taken against the professional to whom a member of the public was referred.
